Illinois, session 104th, SB3374.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 11-208.8, 11-601, and 11-604 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-208.8)7    Sec. 11-208.8. Automated speed enforcement systems in 8safety zones.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Automated speed enforcement system" means a photographic 11device, radar device, laser device, or other electrical or 12mechanical device or devices installed or utilized in a safety 13zone and designed to record the speed of a vehicle and obtain a 14clear photograph or other recorded image of the vehicle and 15the vehicle's registration plate or digital registration plate 16while the driver is violating Article VI of Chapter 11 of this 17Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance.18    An automated speed enforcement system is a system, located 19in a safety zone which is under the jurisdiction of a 20municipality, that produces a recorded image of a motor 21vehicle's violation of a provision of this Code or a local 22ordinance and is designed to obtain a clear recorded image of 23the vehicle and the vehicle's license plate. The recorded   SB3374- 2 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1image must also display the time, date, and location of the 2violation.3    "Owner" means the person or entity to whom the vehicle is 4registered.5    "Recorded image" means images recorded by an automated 6speed enforcement system on:7        (1) 2 or more photographs;8        (2) 2 or more microphotographs;9        (3) 2 or more electronic images; or10        (4) a video recording showing the motor vehicle and, 11    on at least one image or portion of the recording, clearly 12    identifying the registration plate or digital registration 13    plate number of the motor vehicle.14    "Safety zone" means an area that is within one-eighth of a 15mile from the nearest property line of any public or private 16elementary or secondary school, or from the nearest property 17line of any facility, area, or land owned by a school district 18that is used for educational purposes approved by the Illinois 19State Board of Education, not including school district 20headquarters or administrative buildings. A safety zone also 21includes an area that is within one-eighth of a mile from the 22nearest property line of any facility, area, or land owned by a 23park district used for recreational purposes. However, if any 24portion of a roadway is within either one-eighth mile radius, 25the safety zone also shall include the roadway extended to the 26furthest portion of the next furthest intersection. The term   SB3374- 3 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1"safety zone" does not include any portion of the roadway 2known as Lake Shore Drive or any controlled access highway 3with 8 or more lanes of traffic or any roadway in which the 30 4mile per hour maximum speed limit is decreased by local 5ordinance without an engineering or traffic investigation in 6accordance with subsection (b) of Section 11-604 after the 7effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 8Assembly. 9    (a-5) The automated speed enforcement system shall be 10operational and violations shall be recorded only at the 11following times: 12        (i) if the safety zone is based upon the property line 13    of any facility, area, or land owned by a school district, 14    only on school days and no earlier than 6 a.m. and no later 15    than 8:30 p.m. if the school day is during the period of 16    Monday through Thursday, or 9 p.m. if the school day is a 17    Friday; and18        (ii) if the safety zone is based upon the property 19    line of any facility, area, or land owned by a park 20    district, no earlier than one hour prior to the time that 21    the facility, area, or land is open to the public or other 22    patrons, and no later than one hour after the facility, 23    area, or land is closed to the public or other patrons. 24    (b) A municipality that produces a recorded image of a 25motor vehicle's violation of a provision of this Code or a 26local ordinance must make the recorded images of a violation   SB3374- 4 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1accessible to the alleged violator by providing the alleged 2violator with a website address, accessible through the 3Internet. 4    (c) Notwithstanding any penalties for any other violations 5of this Code, the owner of a motor vehicle used in a traffic 6violation recorded by an automated speed enforcement system 7shall be subject to the following penalties: 8        (1) if the recorded speed is no less than 6 miles per 9    hour and no more than 10 miles per hour over the legal 10    speed limit, a civil penalty not exceeding $50, plus an 11    additional penalty of not more than $50 for failure to pay 12    the original penalty in a timely manner; or13        (2) if the recorded speed is more than 10 miles per 14    hour over the legal speed limit, a civil penalty not 15    exceeding $100, plus an additional penalty of not more 16    than $100 for failure to pay the original penalty in a 17    timely manner.18    A penalty may not be imposed under this Section if the 19driver of the motor vehicle received a Uniform Traffic 20Citation from a police officer for a speeding violation 21occurring within one-eighth of a mile and 15 minutes of the 22violation that was recorded by the system. A violation for 23which a civil penalty is imposed under this Section is not a 24violation of a traffic regulation governing the movement of 25vehicles and may not be recorded on the driving record of the 26owner of the vehicle. A law enforcement officer is not   SB3374- 5 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1required to be present or to witness the violation. No penalty 2may be imposed under this Section if the recorded speed of a 3vehicle is 5 miles per hour or less over the legal speed limit. 4The municipality may send, in the same manner that notices are 5sent under this Section, a speed violation warning notice 6where the violation involves a speed of 5 miles per hour or 7less above the legal speed limit.8    (d) The net proceeds that a municipality receives from 9civil penalties imposed under an automated speed enforcement 10system, after deducting all non-personnel and personnel costs 11associated with the operation and maintenance of such system, 12shall be expended or obligated by the municipality for the 13following purposes:14        (i) public safety initiatives to ensure safe passage 15    around schools, and to provide police protection and 16    surveillance around schools and parks, including but not 17    limited to: (1) personnel costs; and (2) non-personnel 18    costs such as construction and maintenance of public 19    safety infrastructure and equipment;20        (ii) initiatives to improve pedestrian and traffic 21    safety;22        (iii) construction and maintenance of infrastructure 23    within the municipality, including but not limited to 24    roads and bridges; and25        (iv) after school programs. 26    (e) For each violation of a provision of this Code or a   SB3374- 6 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1local ordinance recorded by an automated speed enforcement 2system, the municipality having jurisdiction shall issue a 3written notice of the violation to the registered owner of the 4vehicle as the alleged violator. The notice shall be delivered 5to the registered owner of the vehicle, by mail, within 30 days 6after the Secretary of State notifies the municipality of the 7identity of the owner of the vehicle, but in no event later 8than 90 days after the violation.9    (f) The notice required under subsection (e) of this 10Section shall include:11        (1) the name and address of the registered owner of 12    the vehicle;13        (2) the registration number of the motor vehicle 14    involved in the violation;15        (3) the violation charged;16        (4) the date, time, and location where the violation 17    occurred;18        (5) a copy of the recorded image or images;19        (6) the amount of the civil penalty imposed and the 20    date by which the civil penalty should be paid;21        (7) a statement that recorded images are evidence of a 22    violation of a speed restriction;23        (8) a warning that failure to pay the civil penalty or 24    to contest liability in a timely manner is an admission of 25    liability;26        (9) a statement that the person may elect to proceed   SB3374- 7 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1    by:2            (A) paying the fine; or3            (B) challenging the charge in court, by mail, or 4        by administrative hearing; and5        (10) a website address, accessible through the 6    Internet, where the person may view the recorded images of 7    the violation.8    (g) (Blank).9    (h) Based on inspection of recorded images produced by an 10automated speed enforcement system, a notice alleging that the 11violation occurred shall be evidence of the facts contained in 12the notice and admissible in any proceeding alleging a 13violation under this Section.14    (i) Recorded images made by an automated speed enforcement 15system are confidential and shall be made available only to 16the alleged violator and governmental and law enforcement 17agencies for purposes of adjudicating a violation of this 18Section, for statistical purposes, or for other governmental 19purposes. Any recorded image evidencing a violation of this 20Section, however, may be admissible in any proceeding 21resulting from the issuance of the citation. 22    (j) The court or hearing officer may consider in defense 23of a violation:24        (1) that the motor vehicle or registration plates or 25    digital registration plates of the motor vehicle were 26    stolen before the violation occurred and not under the   SB3374- 8 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1    control or in the possession of the owner or lessee at the 2    time of the violation;3        (1.5) that the motor vehicle was hijacked before the 4    violation occurred and not under the control of or in the 5    possession of the owner or lessee at the time of the 6    violation;7        (2) that the driver of the motor vehicle received a 8    Uniform Traffic Citation from a police officer for a 9    speeding violation occurring within one-eighth of a mile 10    and 15 minutes of the violation that was recorded by the 11    system; and12        (3) any other evidence or issues provided by municipal 13    ordinance.14    (k) To demonstrate that the motor vehicle was hijacked or 15the motor vehicle or registration plates or digital 16registration plates were stolen before the violation occurred 17and were not under the control or possession of the owner or 18lessee at the time of the violation, the owner or lessee must 19submit proof that a report concerning the motor vehicle or 20registration plates was filed with a law enforcement agency in 21a timely manner.22    (l) A roadway equipped with an automated speed enforcement 23system shall be posted with a sign conforming to the national 24Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices that is visible to 25approaching traffic stating that vehicle speeds are being 26photo-enforced and indicating the speed limit. The   SB3374- 9 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1municipality shall install such additional signage as it 2determines is necessary to give reasonable notice to drivers 3as to where automated speed enforcement systems are installed.4    (m) A roadway where a new automated speed enforcement 5system is installed shall be posted with signs providing 30 6days notice of the use of a new automated speed enforcement 7system prior to the issuance of any citations through the 8automated speed enforcement system.9    (n) The compensation paid for an automated speed 10enforcement system must be based on the value of the equipment 11or the services provided and may not be based on the number of 12traffic citations issued or the revenue generated by the 13system.14    (n-1) No member of the General Assembly and no officer or 15employee of a municipality or county shall knowingly accept 16employment or receive compensation or fees for services from a 17vendor that provides automated speed enforcement system 18equipment or services to municipalities or counties. No former 19member of the General Assembly shall, within a period of 2 20years immediately after the termination of service as a member 21of the General Assembly, knowingly accept employment or 22receive compensation or fees for services from a vendor that 23provides automated speed enforcement system equipment or 24services to municipalities or counties. No former officer or 25employee of a municipality or county shall, within a period of 262 years immediately after the termination of municipal or   SB3374- 10 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1county employment, knowingly accept employment or receive 2compensation or fees for services from a vendor that provides 3automated speed enforcement system equipment or services to 4municipalities or counties. 5    (o) (Blank).6    (p) No person who is the lessor of a motor vehicle pursuant 7to a written lease agreement shall be liable for an automated 8speed or traffic law enforcement system violation involving 9such motor vehicle during the period of the lease; provided 10that upon the request of the appropriate authority received 11within 120 days after the violation occurred, the lessor 12provides within 60 days after such receipt the name and 13address of the lessee. The drivers license number of a lessee 14may be subsequently individually requested by the appropriate 15authority if needed for enforcement of this Section.16    Upon the provision of information by the lessor pursuant 17to this subsection, the municipality may issue the violation 18to the lessee of the vehicle in the same manner as it would 19issue a violation to a registered owner of a vehicle pursuant 20to this Section, and the lessee may be held liable for the 21violation. 22    (q) A municipality using an automated speed enforcement 23system must provide notice to drivers by publishing the 24locations of all safety zones where system equipment is 25installed on the website of the municipality.26    (r) A municipality operating an automated speed   SB3374- 11 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1enforcement system shall conduct a statistical analysis to 2assess the safety impact of the system following installation 3of the system and every 2 years thereafter. A municipality 4operating an automated speed enforcement system before the 5effective date of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 6Assembly shall conduct a statistical analysis to assess the 7safety impact of the system by no later than one year after the 8effective date of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 9Assembly and every 2 years thereafter. Each statistical 10analysis shall be based upon the best available crash, 11traffic, and other data, and shall cover a period of time 12before and after installation of the system sufficient to 13provide a statistically valid comparison of safety impact. 14Each statistical analysis shall be consistent with 15professional judgment and acceptable industry practice. Each 16statistical analysis also shall be consistent with the data 17required for valid comparisons of before and after conditions 18and shall be conducted within a reasonable period following 19the installation of the automated traffic law enforcement 20system. Each statistical analysis required by this subsection 21shall be made available to the public and shall be published on 22the website of the municipality.23    (s) This Section applies only to municipalities with a 24population of 1,000,000 or more inhabitants.25    (t) If a county or municipality selects a new vendor for 26its automated speed enforcement system and must, as a   SB3374- 12 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1consequence, apply for a permit, approval, or other 2authorization from the Department for reinstallation of one or 3more malfunctioning components of that system and if, at the 4time of the application for the permit, approval, or other 5authorization, the new vendor operates an automated speed 6enforcement system for any other county or municipality in the 7State, then the Department shall approve or deny the county or 8municipality's application for the permit, approval, or other 9authorization within 90 days after its receipt. 10    (u) The Department may revoke any permit, approval, or 11other authorization granted to a county or municipality for 12the placement, installation, or operation of an automated 13speed enforcement system if any official or employee who 14serves that county or municipality is charged with bribery, 15official misconduct, or a similar crime related to the 16placement, installation, or operation of the automated speed 17enforcement system in the county or municipality.18    The Department shall adopt any rules necessary to 19implement and administer this subsection. The rules adopted by 20the Department shall describe the revocation process, shall 21ensure that notice of the revocation is provided, and shall 22provide an opportunity to appeal the revocation. Any county or 23municipality that has a permit, approval, or other 24authorization revoked under this subsection may not reapply 25for such a permit, approval, or other authorization for a 26period of 1 year after the revocation.   SB3374- 13 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1    (v) The University of Illinois Chicago Urban 2Transportation Center shall conduct a study that includes the 3following: 4        (1) a comprehensive review of the City of Chicago's 5    website multi-year crash data on North and South DuSable 6    Lake Shore Drive;7        (2) the available research on potential effectiveness 8    of cameras powered by artificial intelligence in improving 9    compliance and reducing crashes and road fatalities on 10    North and South DuSable Lake Shore Drive; 11        (3) an analysis of driving behavior to detect risky 12    driving patterns and to address the DuSable Lake Shore 13    Drive crash corridors;14        (4) an assessment of the effectiveness of 15    psychological deterrence in reducing habitual speeding; 16    and17        (5) an assessment of how fatalities can be reduced 18    using these cameras powered by artificial intelligence and 19    other technical options that may be available in place of 20    cameras powered by artificial intelligence.21    The Department shall adopt any rules necessary to 22implement this subsection (v). 23(Source: P.A. 103-364, eff. 7-28-23; 104-381, eff. 1-1-26.) 24    (625 ILCS 5/11-601)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-601)25    Sec. 11-601. General speed restrictions.   SB3374- 14 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1    (a) No vehicle may be driven upon any highway of this State 2at a speed which is greater than is reasonable and proper with 3regard to traffic conditions and the use of the highway, or 4endangers the safety of any person or property. The fact that 5the speed of a vehicle does not exceed the applicable maximum 6speed limit does not relieve the driver from the duty to 7decrease speed when approaching and crossing an intersection, 8approaching and going around a curve, when approaching a hill 9crest, when traveling upon any narrow or winding roadway, or 10when special hazard exists with respect to pedestrians, 11bicyclists, or other traffic or by reason of weather or 12highway conditions. Speed must be decreased as may be 13necessary to avoid colliding with any person or vehicle on or 14entering the highway in compliance with legal requirements and 15the duty of all persons to use due care.16    (a-5) For purposes of this Section, "urban district" does 17not include any interstate highway as defined by Section 181-133.1 of this Code which includes all highways under the 19jurisdiction of the Illinois State Toll Highway Authority. 20    (b) No person may drive a vehicle upon any highway of this 21State at a speed which is greater than the applicable 22statutory maximum speed limit established by paragraphs (c), 23(d), (e), (f) or (g) of this Section, by Section 11-605 or by a 24regulation or ordinance made under this Chapter.25    (c) Unless some other speed restriction is established 26under this Chapter, the maximum speed limit in an urban   SB3374- 15 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1district for all vehicles is:2        1. 30 miles per hour; and3        2. 15 miles per hour in an alley.4    (d) Unless some other speed restriction is established 5under this Chapter, the maximum speed limit outside an urban 6district for any vehicle is (1) 65 miles per hour for all or 7part of highways that are designated by the Department, have 8at least 4 lanes of traffic, and have a separation between the 9roadways moving in opposite directions and (2) 55 miles per 10hour for all other highways, roads, and streets.11    (d-1) Unless some other speed restriction is established 12under this Chapter, the maximum speed limit outside an urban 13district for any vehicle is (1) 70 miles per hour on any 14interstate highway as defined by Section 1-133.1 of this Code 15which includes all highways under the jurisdiction of the 16Illinois State Toll Highway Authority; (2) 65 miles per hour 17for all or part of highways that are designated by the 18Department, have at least 4 lanes of traffic, and have a 19separation between the roadways moving in opposite directions; 20and (3) 55 miles per hour for all other highways, roads, and 21streets. The counties of Cook, DuPage, Kane, Lake, Madison, 22McHenry, St. Clair, and Will may adopt ordinances setting a 23maximum speed limit on highways, roads, and streets that is 24lower than the limits established by this Section. 25    (e) In the counties of Cook, DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, 26and Will, unless some lesser speed restriction is established   SB3374- 16 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1under this Chapter, the maximum speed limit outside an urban 2district for a second division vehicle designed or used for 3the carrying of a gross weight of 8,001 pounds or more 4(including the weight of the vehicle and maximum load) is 60 5miles per hour on any interstate highway as defined by Section 61-133.1 of this Code and 55 miles per hour on all other 7highways, roads, and streets.8    (e-1) (Blank). 9    (f) Unless some other speed restriction is established 10under this Chapter, the maximum speed limit outside an urban 11district for a bus is:12        1. 65 miles per hour upon any highway which has at 13    least 4 lanes of traffic and of which the roadways for 14    traffic moving in opposite directions are separated by a 15    strip of ground which is not surfaced or suitable for 16    vehicular traffic, except that the maximum speed limit for 17    a bus on all highways, roads, or streets not under the 18    jurisdiction of the Department or the Illinois State Toll 19    Highway Authority is 55 miles per hour;20        1.5. 70 miles per hour upon any interstate highway as 21    defined by Section 1-133.1 of this Code outside the 22    counties of Cook, DuPage, Kane, Lake, McHenry, and Will; 23    and24        2. 55 miles per hour on any other highway.25    (g) (Blank). 26(Source: P.A. 98-511, eff. 1-1-14; 98-1126, eff. 1-1-15;   SB3374- 17 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b198-1128, eff. 1-1-15; 99-78, eff. 7-20-15.) 2    (625 ILCS 5/11-604)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-604)3    Sec. 11-604. Alteration of limits by local authorities. 4    (a) Subject to the limitations set forth in this Section, 5the county board of a county may establish absolute maximum 6speed limits on all county highways, township roads and 7district roads as defined in the Illinois Highway Code, except 8those under the jurisdiction of the Department or of the 9Illinois State Toll Highway Authority, as described in 10Sections 11-602 and 11-603 of this Chapter; and any park 11district, city, village, or incorporated town may establish 12absolute maximum speed limits on all streets which are within 13its corporate limits and which are not under the jurisdiction 14of the Department or of such Authority, and for which the 15county or a highway commissioner of such county does not have 16maintenance responsibility.17    (b) Whenever any such park district, city, village, or 18incorporated town determines, upon the basis of an engineering 19or traffic investigation concerning a highway or street on 20which it is authorized by this Section to establish speed 21limits, that a maximum speed limit prescribed in Section 2211-601 of this Chapter is greater or less than is reasonable or 23safe with respect to the conditions found to exist at any place 24or along any part or zone of such highway or street, the local 25authority or park district shall determine and declare by   SB3374- 18 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1ordinance a reasonable and safe absolute maximum speed limit 2at such place or along such part or zone, which: 3        (1) Decreases the limit within an urban district which 4    shall not require an engineering or traffic investigation 5    to a maximum speed limit of 25 miles per hour, but not to 6    less than 20 miles per hour and a maximum speed limit of 10 7    miles per hour in an alley; or 8        (2) Increases the limit within an urban district, but 9    not to more than 55 miles per hour, if after increasing the 10    limit within an urban district an engineering or traffic 11    investigation is required to decrease the limit as 12    described in Section 11-601 or in paragraph (1); or 13        (3) Decreases the limit outside of an urban district, 14    but not to less than 35 miles per hour, except as otherwise 15    provided in subparagraph 4 of this paragraph; or 16        (4) Decreases the limit within a residence district 17    which shall not require an engineering or traffic 18    investigation to a maximum speed limit of 20 , but not to 19    less than 25 miles per hour, except as otherwise provided 20    in paragraph (1) subparagraph 1 of this paragraph.21    The park district, city, village, or incorporated town may 22make such limit applicable at all times or only during certain 23specified times. Not more than 6 such alterations shall be 24made per mile along a highway or street; and the difference in 25limit between adjacent altered speed zones shall not be more 26than 10 miles per hour.  SB3374- 19 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1    A limit so determined and declared by a park district, 2city, village, or incorporated town shall be posted with signs 3designating the new speed limit and becomes effective, and 4suspends the application of the limit prescribed in Section 511-601 of this Chapter, when appropriate signs giving notice 6of the limit are erected at the proper place or along the 7proper part or zone of the highway or street. Electronic 8speed-detecting devices shall not be used within 500 feet 9beyond any such sign in the direction of travel; if so used in 10violation of this Section evidence obtained thereby shall be 11inadmissible in any prosecution for speeding. However, nothing 12in this Section prohibits the use of such electronic 13speed-detecting devices within 500 feet of a sign within a 14special school speed zone indicating such zone, conforming to 15the requirements of Section 11-605 of this Act, nor shall 16evidence obtained thereby be inadmissible in any prosecution 17for speeding provided the use of such device shall apply only 18to the enforcement of the speed limit in such special school 19speed zone.20    (c) A county engineer or superintendent of highways may 21submit to the Department for approval, a county policy for 22establishing altered speed zones on township and county 23highways based upon engineering and traffic investigations.24    (d) Whenever the county board of a county determines that 25a maximum speed limit is greater or less than is reasonable or 26safe with respect to the conditions found to exist at any place   SB3374- 20 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1or along any part or zone of the highway or road, the county 2board shall determine and declare by ordinance a reasonable 3and safe absolute maximum speed limit at that place or along 4that part or zone. However, the maximum speed limit shall not 5exceed 55 miles per hour. Upon receipt of an engineering study 6for the part or zone of highway in question from the county 7engineer, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 8county board of a county may determine and declare by 9ordinance a reduction in the maximum speed limit at any place 10or along any part or zone of a county highway whenever the 11county board, in its sole discretion, determines that the 12reduction in the maximum speed limit is reasonable and safe. 13The county board shall may post signs designating the new 14speed limit. The limit becomes effective, and suspends the 15application of the limit prescribed in Section 11-601 of this 16Chapter, when appropriate signs giving notice of the limit are 17erected at the proper place or along the proper part of the 18zone of the highway. Electronic speed-detecting devices shall 19not be used within 500 feet beyond any such sign in the 20direction of travel; if so used in violation of this Section, 21evidence obtained thereby shall be inadmissible in any 22prosecution for speeding. However, nothing in this Section 23prohibits the use of such electronic speed-detecting devices 24within 500 feet of a sign within a special school speed zone 25indicating such zone, conforming to the requirements of 26Section 11-605 of this Act, nor shall evidence obtained   SB3374- 21 -LRB104 19976 LNS 33427 b1thereby be inadmissible in any prosecution for speeding 2provided the use of such device shall apply only to the 3enforcement of the speed limit in such special school speed 4zone.5(Source: P.A. 95-574, eff. 6-1-08; 95-788, eff. 8-7-08.)